Oklahoma, session 2026, SB588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-101.25a of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A school district or technology center school that is


considering an individual for employment shall request from the


individual’s current or former employing school district or


districts or technology center school or schools an attestation to


whether allegations of inappropriate behavior between the individual


and a student or students were raised and whether there was a

Req. No. 1294 Page 1


pending or ongoing investigation of inappropriate behavior between


the individual and a student or students. The attestation shall be


provided on forms prescribed by the State Department of Education or


the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education.


B. If a school district or technology center school fails to


request or fails to provide an attestation required by subsection A


of this section:


1. The superintendent of the school district or technology


center school shall be dismissed or not reemployed, subject to the


provisions of the Teacher Due Process Act of 1990; and


2. The board positions of the school district board of


education or technology center school district board of education


shall be declared vacant, and individuals who held such positions


shall be ineligible to serve on a school district board of education


or technology center school district board of education for five (5)


years. The Governor shall appoint board of education members


necessary to constitute a quorum, as provided for in subsection F of


Section 13A-110 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. If a school district or technology center school fails to


provide an attestation required by subsection A of this section and


a subsequent employing school district or technology center school


is found liable in a civil action or agrees to a settlement of a


civil action, the school district or technology center school that


failed to provide the attestation shall be required to provide fifty

Req. No. 1294 Page 2


percent (50%) of any monetary damages imposed by a court in the


civil action or fifty percent (50%) of any settlement amount agreed


upon by the parties and approved by the court.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1294 EB 1/19/2025 5:39:18 AM





























Req. No. 1294 Page 3